California statutes. Civil Code
A regular or special assessment and any late charges, reasonable fees and costs of collection, reasonable attorney’s fees, if any, and interest, if any, shall be a debt of the owner of the separate interest at the time the assessment or other sums are levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6810.

(a) When an owner of a separate interest makes a payment toward an assessment, the owner may request a receipt and the association shall provide it. The receipt shall indicate the date of payment and the person who received it.

(b) The association shall provide a mailing address for overnight payment of assessments.

(c) An owner shall
not be liable for any charges, interest, or costs of collection for an assessment payment that is asserted to be delinquent, if it is determined the assessment was paid on time to the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6812.

At least 30 days prior to recording a lien upon the separate interest of the owner of record to collect a debt that is past due under Section 6808, the association shall notify the owner of record in writing by certified mail of the following:

(a) A general description of the collection and lien enforcement procedures of the association and the method of calculation of the amount, a statement that the owner of the
separate interest has the right to inspect the association records pursuant to Section 8333 of the Corporations Code, and the following statement in 14-point boldface type, if printed, or in capital letters, if typed:

“IMPORTANT NOTICE: IF YOUR SEPARATE INTEREST IS PLACED IN FORECLOSURE BECAUSE YOU ARE BEHIND IN YOUR ASSESSMENTS, IT MAY BE SOLD WITHOUT COURT ACTION.”

(b) An itemized statement of the charges owed by the owner, including items on the statement which indicate the amount of any delinquent assessments, the fees and reasonable costs of collection, reasonable attorney’s fees, any late charges, and interest, if any.

(c) A statement that the owner shall not be liable to pay the charges, interest, and costs of collection, if it is determined the assessment was paid on time to the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6814.

(a) The amount of the assessment, plus any costs of collection, late charges, and interest assessed in accordance with Section 6808, shall be a lien on the owner’s separate interest in the common interest development from and after the time the association causes to be recorded with the county recorder of the county in which the separate interest is located, a notice of delinquent assessment, which shall state the amount of the assessment and other sums imposed
in accordance with Section 6808, a legal description of the owner’s separate interest in the common interest development against which the assessment and other sums are levied, and the name of the record owner of the separate interest in the common interest development against which the lien is imposed.

(b) The itemized statement of the charges owed by the owner described in subdivision (b) of Section 6812 shall be recorded together with the notice of delinquent assessment.

(c) In order for the lien to be enforced by nonjudicial foreclosure as provided in Sections 6820 and 6822, the notice of delinquent assessment shall state the name and address of the trustee authorized by the association to enforce the lien by sale.

(d) The notice of delinquent assessment shall be signed by the person designated in the declaration
or by the association for that purpose, or if no one is designated, by the president of the association.

(e) A copy of the recorded notice of delinquent assessment shall be mailed by certified mail to every person whose name is shown as an owner of the separate interest in the association’s records, and the notice shall be mailed no later than 10 calendar days after recordation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6816.

A lien created pursuant to Section 6814 shall be prior to all other liens recorded subsequent to the notice of delinquent assessment, except that the declaration may provide for the subordination thereof to any other liens and encumbrances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6818.

(a) Within 21 days of the payment of the sums specified in the notice of delinquent assessment, the association shall record or cause to be recorded in the office of the county recorder in which the notice of delinquent assessment is recorded a lien release or notice of rescission and provide the owner of the separate interest a copy of the lien release or notice that the delinquent assessment has been satisfied.

(b) If it is determined that a lien previously recorded against the separate interest was recorded in error, the party who recorded the lien shall, within 21 calendar days, record or cause to be recorded in the office of the county recorder in which the notice of delinquent assessment is recorded a lien release or notice of rescission and provide the owner of the separate interest with a declaration that the lien filing or recording was in error and a copy of the lien release or notice of rescission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6819.

An association that fails to comply with the procedures set forth in this section shall, prior to recording a lien, recommence the required notice process. Any costs associated with recommencing the notice process shall be borne by the association and not by the owner of a separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Assessment Collection [6820. - 6828.]

6820.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, after the expiration of 30 days following the recording of a lien created pursuant to Section 6814, the lien may be enforced in any manner permitted by law, including sale by the court, sale by the trustee designated in the notice of delinquent assessment, or sale by a trustee substituted pursuant to Section 2934a.

(b) Nothing in Article 2
(commencing with Section 6808) or in subdivision (a) of Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure prohibits actions against the owner of a separate interest to recover sums for which a lien is created pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6808) or prohibits an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6822.

(a) Any sale by the trustee shall be conducted in accordance with Sections 2924, 2924b, and 2924c applicable to the exercise of powers of sale in mortgages and deeds of trust.

(b) In addition to the requirements of Section 2924, the association shall serve a notice of default on the person named as the owner of the separate interest in the association’s records or, if that person has designated a
legal representative pursuant to this subdivision, on that legal representative. Service shall be in accordance with the manner of service of summons in Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. An owner may designate a legal representative in a writing that is mailed to the association in a manner that indicates that the association has received it.

(c) The fees of a trustee may not exceed the amounts prescribed in Sections 2924c and 2924d, plus the cost of service for the notice of default pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6824.

(a) A monetary charge imposed by the association as a means of reimbursing the association for costs incurred by the association in the repair of damage to common areas and facilities caused by a member or the member’s guest or tenant may become a lien against the member’s separate interest enforceable by the sale of the interest under Sections 2924, 2924b, and 2924c, provided the authority to impose a lien is set forth in the governing documents.

(b) A monetary penalty imposed by the association as a disciplinary measure for failure of a member to comply with the governing documents, except for the late payments, may not be characterized nor treated in the governing documents as an assessment that may become a lien against the member’s separate interest enforceable by the sale of the interest under Sections 2924, 2924b, and 2924c.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6826.

(a) An association may not voluntarily assign or pledge the association’s right to collect payments or assessments, or to enforce or foreclose a lien to a third party, except when the assignment or pledge is made to a financial institution or lender chartered or licensed under federal or state law, when acting within the scope of that charter or license, as security for a loan obtained by the association.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) restricts the right or ability of an association to assign any unpaid obligations of a former member to a third party for purposes of collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6828.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, this article applies to a lien created on or after January 1, 2014.

(b) A lien created before January 1, 2014, is governed by the law in existence at the time the lien was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Insurance and Liability [6840. - 6840.]

6840.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to offer civil liability protection to owners of the separate interests in a common interest development that have common area owned in tenancy in common if the association carries a certain level of prescribed insurance that covers a cause of action in tort.

(b) Any cause of action in tort against any owner of a separate interest arising solely by reason of an
 ownership interest as a tenant in common in the common area of a common interest development shall be brought only against the association and not against the individual owners of the separate interests, if both of the insurance requirements in paragraphs (1) and (2) are met:

(1) The association maintained and has in effect for this cause of action, one or more policies of insurance that include coverage for general liability of the association.

(2) The coverage described in paragraph (1) is in the following minimum amounts:

(A) At least two million dollars ($2,000,000) if the common interest development consists of 100 or fewer separate interests.

(B) At least three million dollars ($3,000,000) if the common interest development consists of more than
 100 separate interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Dispute Resolution and Enforcement [6850. - 6860.]



  ARTICLE 1. Disciplinary Action [6850. - 6854.]

6850.

(a) If an association adopts or has adopted a policy imposing any monetary penalty, including any fee, on any association member for a violation of the governing documents, including any monetary penalty relating to the activities of a guest or tenant of the member, the board shall adopt and distribute to each member, by individual notice, a schedule of the monetary penalties that may be assessed for those violations, which shall be in accordance with
authorization for member discipline contained in the governing documents.

(b) Any new or revised monetary penalty that is adopted after complying with subdivision (a) may be included in a supplement that is delivered to the members individually, pursuant to Section 6553.

(c) A monetary penalty for a violation of the governing documents shall not exceed the monetary penalty stated in the schedule of monetary penalties or supplement that is in effect at the time of the violation.

(d) An association shall provide a copy of the most recently distributed schedule of monetary penalties, along with any applicable supplements to that schedule, to any member on request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6854.

Nothing in Section 6850 shall be construed to create, expand, or reduce the authority of the board to impose monetary penalties on a member for a violation of the governing documents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Civil Actions [6856. - 6860.]

6856.

(a) The covenants and restrictions in the declaration shall be enforceable equitable servitudes, unless unreasonable, and shall inure to the benefit of and bind all owners of separate interests in the development. Unless the declaration states otherwise, these servitudes may be enforced by any owner of a separate interest or by the association, or by both.

(b) A governing document other than the
declaration may be enforced by the association against an owner of a separate interest or by an owner of a separate interest against the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6858.

An association has standing to institute, defend, settle, or intervene in litigation, arbitration, mediation, or administrative proceedings in its own name as the real party in interest and without joining with it, the members, in matters pertaining to the following:

(a) Enforcement of the governing documents.

(b) Damage to the common area.

(c) Damage to a separate interest that the association is obligated to maintain or repair.

(d) Damage to a separate interest that arises out of, or is integrally related to, damage to the common area or a separate interest that the association is obligated to maintain or repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6860.

(a) In an action maintained by an association pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 6858, the amount of damages recovered by the association shall be reduced by the amount of damages allocated to the association or its managing agents in direct proportion to their percentage of fault based upon principles of comparative fault. The comparative fault of the association or its managing agents may be raised by way of defense, but shall not be the basis
for a cross-action or separate action against the association or its managing agents for contribution or implied indemnity, where the only damage was sustained by the association or its members. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to require that comparative fault be pleaded as an affirmative defense, rather than a separate cause of action, where the only damage was sustained by the association or its members.

(b) In an action involving damages described in subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 6858, the defendant or cross-defendant may allege and prove the comparative fault of the association or its managing agents as a setoff to the liability of the defendant or cross-defendant even if the association is not a party to the litigation or is no longer a party whether by reason of settlement, dismissal, or otherwise.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply
to actions commenced on or after January 1, 1993.

(d) Nothing in this section affects a person’s liability under Section 1431, or the liability of the association or its managing agent for an act or omission that causes damages to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Construction Defect Litigation [6874. - 6876.]

6874.

(a) As soon as is reasonably practicable after the association and the builder have entered into a settlement agreement or the matter has otherwise been resolved regarding alleged defects in the common areas, alleged defects in the separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, or alleged defects in the separate interests that arise out of, or are integrally related to, defects in the common areas or separate interests that the
 association is obligated to maintain or repair, where the defects giving rise to the dispute have not been corrected, the association shall, in writing, inform only the members of the association whose names appear on the records of the association that the matter has been resolved, by settlement agreement or other means, and disclose all of the following:

(1) A general description of the defects that the association reasonably believes, as of the date of the disclosure, will be corrected or replaced.

(2) A good faith estimate, as of the date of the disclosure, of when the association believes that the defects identified in paragraph (1) will be corrected or replaced. The association may state that the estimate may be modified.

(3) The status of the claims for defects in the design or construction of the common
 interest development that were not identified in paragraph (1) whether expressed in a preliminary list of defects sent to each member of the association or otherwise claimed and disclosed to the members of the association.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude an association from amending the disclosures required pursuant to subdivision (a), and any amendments shall supersede any prior conflicting information disclosed to the members of the association and shall retain any privilege attached to the original disclosures.

(c) Disclosure of the information required pursuant to subdivision (a) or authorized by subdivision (b) shall not waive any privilege attached to the information.

(d) For the purposes of the disclosures required pursuant to this section, the term “defects” shall be defined to include any damage
 resulting from defects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6876.

(a) Not later than 30 days prior to the filing of any civil action by the association against the declarant or other developer of a common interest development for alleged damage to the common areas, alleged damage to the separate interests that the association is obligated to maintain or repair, or alleged damage to the separate interests that arises out of, or is integrally related to, damage to the common areas or separate interests that the association is
 obligated to maintain or repair, the board shall provide a written notice to each member of the association who appears on the records of the association when the notice is provided. This notice shall specify all of the following:

(1) That a meeting will take place to discuss problems that may lead to the filing of a civil action.

(2) The options, including civil actions, that are available to address the problems.

(3) The time and place of this meeting.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the association has reason to believe that the applicable statute of limitations will expire before the association files the civil action, the association may give the notice, as described above, within 30 days after the filing of the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 21.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. AUTOMATIC CHECKOUT SYSTEM [7100. - 7106.]

7100.

(a) Every retail grocery store or grocery department within a general retail merchandise store which uses a point-of-sale system shall cause to have a clearly readable price indicated on 85 percent of the total number of packaged consumer commodities offered for sale which are not exempt pursuant to subdivision (b).

The management of any such retail grocery store or grocery department shall determine the number of consumer commodities normally offered for sale on a daily basis, shall determine the
 consumer commodities to be exempted pursuant to this subdivision, and shall maintain a list of those consumer commodities exempt pursuant to this subdivision. The list shall be made available to a designated representative of the appropriate local union, the members of which are responsible for item pricing, in those stores or departments that have collective bargaining agreements, seven days prior to an item or items being exempted pursuant to this subdivision. In addition, the list shall be available and posted in a prominent place in the store seven days prior to an item or items being exempted pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Any consumer commodity which was not generally item-priced on January 1, 1977, as determined by the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section
 12604.5 of the Business and Professions Code, as in effect July 8, 1977.

(2) Any unpackaged fresh food produce, or to consumer commodities which are under three cubic inches in size, weigh less than three ounces, and are priced under forty cents ($0.40).

(3) Any consumer commodity offered as a sale item or as a special.

(4) Any business which has as its only regular employees the owner thereof, or the parent, spouse, or child of such owner, or, in addition thereto, not more than two other regular employees.

(5) Identical items within a multi-item package.

(6) Items sold through a vending machine.

(c) For the purposes of this
 section:

(1) “Point-of-sale system” means any computer or electronic system used by a retail establishment such as, but not limited to, Universal Product Code scanners, price lookup codes, or an electronic price lookup system as a means for determining the price of the item being purchased by a consumer.

(2) “Consumer commodity” includes:

(A) Food, including all material whether solid, liquid, or mixed, and whether simple or compound, which is used or intended for consumption by human beings or domestic animals normally kept as household pets, and all substances or ingredients added to any such material for any purpose. This definition shall not apply to individual packages of cigarettes or individual cigars.

(B) Napkins, facial tissues, toilet
 tissues, foil wrapping, plastic wrapping, paper toweling, and disposable plates and cups.

(C) Detergents, soaps, and other cleaning agents.

(D) Pharmaceuticals, including nonprescription drugs, bandages, female hygiene products, and toiletries.

(3) “Grocery department” means an area within a general retail merchandise store which is engaged primarily in the retail sale of packaged food, rather than food prepared for immediate consumption on or off the premises.

(4) “Grocery store” means a store engaged primarily in the retail sale of packaged food, rather than food prepared for consumption on the premises.

(5) “Sale item or special” means any consumer commodity offered in good faith for a
 period of 14 days or less, on sale at a price below the normal price that item is usually sold for in that store. The Department of Food and Agriculture shall determine the normal length of a sale held for consumer commodities generally item priced on January 1, 1977, in stores regulated pursuant to this chapter, and that period shall be used for the purposes of this subdivision. The department’s determination as to the normal length of a sale shall be binding for the purposes of this section, but each such determination shall not exceed seven days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 566, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7101.

(a) The intentional violation of Section 7100 is punishable by a civil penalty of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) Failure to have a clearly readable price indicated on 12 units of the same item required to be item-priced of the same commodity shall constitute a presumption of intent to violate Section 7100.

(c) Every additional 12 units of the same item required to be item-priced that fail to have a price indicated on them shall constitute a presumption
 of intent to violate Section 7100.

(d) Each day that a violation continues shall also constitute a separate violation after notification thereof to the manager or assistant manager of the retail grocery store or the grocery department of the general retail merchandise store and shall constitute a presumption of intent to violate Section 7100.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person may bring an action to enjoin a violation of Section 7100.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7102.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who violates Sections 7100 and 7101 shall be liable to any person injured for any losses and expenses thereby incurred, and for the sum of fifty dollars ($50) in addition thereto. The remedy set forth herein is applicable only to actions brought in the name of, and on behalf of, a single plaintiff and shall not be applicable in multiple plaintiff or class actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7103.

Improper pricing on the shelf or on the item due to unintentional error shall not constitute a violation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.

The remedies set forth in Sections 7101 and 7102 are the exclusive remedies available to any person, state or local agency or law enforcement official.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7105.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Rosenthal-Roberti Item Pricing Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7106.

It is the intention of the Legislature that this part shall occupy the field with regard to item pricing and shall preempt all local ordinances, rules, or regulations concerning item pricing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. WORKS OF IMPROVEMENT [8000. - 9566.]



  TITLE 1. WORKS OF IMPROVEMENT GENERALLY [8000. - 8154.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [8000. - 8066.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [8000. - 8050.]

8000.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

“Admitted surety insurer” has the meaning provided in Section 995.120 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8004.

“Claimant” means a person that has a right under this part to record a claim of lien, give a stop payment notice, or assert a claim against a payment bond, or do any combination of the foregoing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8006.

“Construction lender” means either of the following:

(a) A mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust lending funds with which the cost of all or part of a work of improvement is to be paid, or the assignee or successor in interest of the mortgagee or beneficiary.

(b) An escrow holder or
 other person holding funds provided by an owner, lender, or another person as a fund for with which the cost of all or part of a work of improvement is to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8008.

“Contract” means an agreement that provides for all or part of a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8010.

“Contract price” means the price agreed to in a direct contract for a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8012.

“Contractor” includes a direct contractor, subcontractor, or both. This section does not apply to Sections 8018 and 8046.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8014.

“Design professional” means a person licensed as an architect pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, licensed as a landscape architect pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, registered as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the
 Business and Professions Code, or licensed as a land surveyor pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8016.

“Direct contract” means a contract between an owner and a direct contractor that provides for all or part of a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8018.

“Direct contractor” means a contractor that has a direct contractual relationship with an owner. A reference in another statute to a “prime contractor” in connection with the provisions in this part means a “direct contractor.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8020.

For the purposes of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000), “funds” means warrant, check, money, or bonds (if bonds are to be issued in payment of the public works contract).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

“Labor, service, equipment, or material” includes, but is not limited to, labor, skills, services, material, supplies, equipment, appliances, power, and surveying, provided for a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.

(a) “Laborer” means a person who, acting as an employee, performs labor upon, or bestows skill or other necessary services on, a work of improvement.

(b) “Laborer” includes a person or entity to which a portion of a laborer’s compensation for a work of improvement, including, but not limited to, employer payments described in Section
 1773.1 of the Labor Code and implementing regulations, is paid by agreement with that laborer or the collective bargaining agent of that laborer.

(c) A person or entity described in subdivision (b) that has standing under applicable law to maintain a direct legal action, in its own name or as an assignee, to collect any portion of compensation owed for a laborer for a work of improvement, shall have standing to enforce any rights or claims of the laborer under this part, to the extent of the compensation agreed to be paid to the person or entity for labor on that improvement. This subdivision is intended to give effect to the longstanding public policy of this state to protect the entire compensation of a laborer on a work of improvement, regardless of the form in which that compensation is to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8026.

“Lien” means a lien under Title 2 (commencing with Section 8160) and includes a lien of a design professional under Section 8302, a lien for a work of improvement under Section 8400, and a lien for a site improvement under Section 8402.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8028.

“Material supplier” means a person that provides material or supplies to be used or consumed in a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.

(a) For the purposes of Title 2 (commencing with Section 8160), “payment bond” means a bond given under Section 8600.

(b) For the purposes of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000), “payment bond” means a bond required by Section 9550.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8032.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, public entity, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8034.

(a) For the purposes of Title 2 (commencing with Section 8160), “preliminary notice” means the notice provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Title 2.

(b) For the purposes of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000), “preliminary notice” means the notice provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9300) of Title
 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8036.

“Public entity” means the state, Regents of the University of California, a county, city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8038.

“Public works contract” has the meaning provided in Section 1101 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8040.

“Site” means the real property on which a work of improvement is situated or planned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8042.

“Site improvement” means any of the following work on real property:

(a) Demolition or removal of improvements, trees, or other vegetation.

(b) Drilling test holes.

(c) Grading, filling, or otherwise improving the real property or a
 street, highway, or sidewalk in front of or adjoining the real property.

(d) Construction or installation of sewers or other public utilities.

(e) Construction of areas, vaults, cellars, or rooms under sidewalks.

(f) Any other work or improvements in preparation of the site for a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8044.

(a) (1) For the purposes of Title 2 (commencing with Section 8160), “stop payment notice” means the notice given by a claimant under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8500) of Title 2.

(2) A stop payment notice given under Title 2 (commencing with Section 8160) may be bonded or unbonded. A “bonded stop payment
 notice” is a notice given with a bond under Section 8532. An “unbonded stop payment notice” is a notice not given with a bond under Section 8532.

(3) Except to the extent Title 2 (commencing with Section 8160) distinguishes between a bonded and an unbonded stop payment notice, a reference in that title to a stop payment notice includes both a bonded and an unbonded notice.

(b) For the purposes of Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000), “stop payment notice” means the notice given by a claimant under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9350) of Title 3.

(c) A reference in another statute to a “stop notice” in connection with the remedies provided in this part means a stop payment notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8046.

“Subcontractor” means a contractor that does not have a direct contractual relationship with an owner. The term includes a contractor that has a contractual relationship with a direct contractor or with another subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8048.

“Work” means labor, service, equipment, or material provided to a work of improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 20.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697 and by Section 8052.)
-------------------------------------------

8050.

(a) “Work of improvement” includes, but is not limited to:
